Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6401
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-6401 to 71-6409 shall be known and may be cited as the Building Construction Act.

Laws 1987, LB 227, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 26;

Laws 2026, LB441, § 1.
July 18, 2026